Tennessee, session 114, SB1933.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 3, Chapter 1, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, the department of correction
shall disclose records and information to any member of the general assembly to enable
the member to determine whether the laws of this state are being complied with
regarding inmates in the department's custody.
(b) If a member of the general assembly receives a written inquiry regarding
whether the laws of this state regarding inmates are being complied with or whether the
laws of this state need to be changed, then the member of the general assembly may
submit a written request to the department of correction, requesting review of the
records and information relating to the inquiry. The member shall include in the request
the name of the inmate whose case file is to be reviewed and any other information that
will assist the department in locating the information.
(c) The member shall sign a form before reviewing the records and information
that outlines the state and federal laws regarding confidentiality and the penalties for
unauthorized release of the information. All records and information being reviewed by a
member of the general assembly must remain in the department's possession.
SB1933
009854
- 1 -

(d) After reviewing the records and information, if the member requests
additional information, the department shall discuss with the member the circumstances
related to the records and information being disclosed.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009854